Illinois, session 104th, HB4222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-15 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-15)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-15)7    Sec. 9-15. It shall be the duty of the Board:8        (1) to develop prescribed forms for filing statements 9    of organization and required reports;10        (2) to prepare, publish, and furnish to the 11    appropriate persons a manual of instructions setting forth 12    recommended uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting 13    under this Article;14        (3) to prescribe suitable rules and regulations to 15    carry out the provisions of this Article. Such rules and 16    regulations shall be published and made available to the 17    public;18        (4) to send by first class mail, after the general 19    primary election in even numbered years, to the chair of 20    each regularly constituted State central committee, county 21    central committee and, in counties with a population of 22    more than 3,000,000, to the committeepersons of each 23    township and ward organization of each political party   HB4222- 2 -LRB104 16321 SPS 29707 b1    notice of their obligations under this Article, along with 2    a form for filing the statement of organization;3        (5) to promptly make all reports and statements filed 4    under this Article available for public inspection and 5    copying no later than 2 business days after their receipt 6    and to permit copying of any such report or statement at 7    the expense of the person requesting the copy;8        (6) to develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing 9    system consistent with the purposes of this Article;10        (7) to compile and maintain a list of all statements 11    or parts of statements pertaining to each candidate;12        (8) to prepare and publish such reports as the Board 13    may deem appropriate;14        (9) to annually notify each political committee that 15    has filed a statement of organization with the Board of 16    the filing dates for each quarterly report, provided that 17    the such notification shall be made by first-class mail, 18    unless the political committee opts to receive 19    notification electronically by via email by indicating its 20    preference to receive the notification electronically on 21    its statement of organization or by filing a quarterly 22    report of campaign contributions electronically; and23        (10) to promptly send, by first class mail directed 24    only to the officers of a political committee, and by 25    certified mail to the address of the political committee, 26    written notice of any fine or penalty assessed or imposed   HB4222- 3 -LRB104 16321 SPS 29707 b1    against the political committee under this Article. 2(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2027.